Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2519
Status as political subdivision.

A joint public agency shall constitute a political subdivision and a public body corporate and politic of this state exercising public powers separate from the participating public agencies. A joint public agency shall have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a political subdivision and a public body corporate and politic exercising powers and acting on behalf of the participating public agencies.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 19.